Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.63.200.
Confidentiality of communication.

A person licensed under this chapter may not reveal to another person a communication made to the licensee by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the licensee in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

a case conference or case consultation with other mental health professionals at which the patient is not identified;

the release of information that the client in writing authorized the licensee to reveal;

information released to the board as part of a disciplinary or other proceeding;

situations where the rules of evidence applicable to the psychotherapist-patient privilege allow the release of the information;

a communication to a potential victim or to law enforcement officers where a threat of imminent serious physical harm to an identified victim has been made by a client; or

a disclosure revealing a communication about an act that the licensee has reasonable cause to suspect constitutes unlawful or unethical conduct that would be grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions by a person licensed to provide health or mental health services, if the disclosure is made only to the licensing board with jurisdiction over the person who allegedly committed the act, and the disclosure is made in good faith.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person licensed under this chapter shall report incidents of

child abuse or neglect as required by AS 47.17;

harm or assaults suffered by a vulnerable adult as required by AS 47.24.

Information obtained by the board under (a)(3) of this section is confidential and is not a public record for purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 152 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Sec. 08.63.210.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

After a hearing, the board may impose a disciplinary sanction under AS

08.01.075

on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the person

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or of another crime that affects the person’s ability to practice competently and safely;

failed to comply with a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or another drug that impairs the person’s ability to practice safely;

engaged in unethical conduct in connection with the delivery of professional services to clients;

engaged in sexual misconduct with a client during the course of therapy, either within or outside the treatment setting, or within two years after therapy or counseling with the client has terminated; in this paragraph, “sexual misconduct” includes sexual contact, as defined in regulations adopted under this chapter, or attempted sexual contact, regardless of the client’s or former client’s consent or lack of consent.

The board may summarily suspend the license of a licensee who refuses to submit to a physical or mental examination under AS

08.63.050(b)

. A person whose license is suspended under this subsection is entitled to a hearing by the board within seven days after the effective date of the order. If, after a hearing, the board upholds the suspension, the licensee may appeal the suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a licensee for the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if

the licensee or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

the licensee requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the licensee is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the licensee sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

the licensee meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The board shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (c) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992; am §§ 5, 6 ch 152 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 08.63.220.
License required if designation used.

A person who is not licensed under this chapter or whose license is suspended or revoked, or whose license has lapsed, who knowingly uses in connection with the person’s name the words or letters “L.M.F.T.,” “L.M.F.C.,” “Licensed Marital and Family Therapist,” “Licensed Marriage and Family Counselor,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is licensed as a marital and family therapist by this state or who in any way, orally or in writing, directly or by implication, knowingly holds out as being licensed by the state as a marital and family therapist in this state is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.63.230.
Disclosure statement.

Before the performance of services, a licensed marital and family therapist shall ensure that the client was furnished a copy of a professional disclosure statement that contained

the name, title, business address, and business telephone number of the marital and family therapist;

a description of the formal professional education of the marital and family therapist, including the institutions attended and the degrees received from the institutions;

the marital and family therapist’s areas of specialization and the services available;

the marital and family therapist’s fee schedule listed by type of service or hourly rate;

a description of the exception to confidentiality contained in AS

08.63.200(a)(6)

; and

at the bottom of the first page of the statement, the following sentence: “This information is required by the Board of Marital and Family Therapy, which regulates all licensed marital and family therapists,” followed by the name, address, and telephone number of the board’s office.

History.

(§ 7 ch 152 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.63.240.
Limitation of practice.

Notwithstanding that a specific act is within the definition of the “practice of marital and family therapy,” a person licensed under this chapter may not perform the act if the person lacks the appropriate education, training, and experience related to the act.

History.

(§ 7 ch 152 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.63.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“advertise” includes issuing or causing to be distributed a card, sign, or device to a person, or causing, permitting, or allowing a sign or marking on or in a building or structure, or in a newspaper, magazine, or directory, or on radio or television, or using other means designed to secure public attention;

“board” means the Board of Marital and Family Therapy;

“course” means a class of at least three credit hours in a graduate program at an accredited educational institution or an institution approved by the board;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“practice of marital and family therapy” means the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders that are referenced in the standard diagnostic nomenclature for marital and family therapy, whether cognitive, affective, or behavioral, within the context of human relationships, particularly marital and family systems; marital and family therapy involves

the professional application of assessments and treatments of psychotherapeutic services to individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating the diagnosed emotional and mental disorders;

an applied understanding of the dynamics of marital and family interactions, along with the application of psychotherapeutic and counseling techniques for the purpose of resolving intrapersonal and interpersonal conflict and changing perceptions, attitudes, and behaviors in the area of human relationships and family life;

“supervision” means face-to-face consultation, direction, review, evaluation, and assessment of the practice of the person being supervised, including direct observation and the review of case presentations, audio tapes, and video tapes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.